California, session 20252026, AB1767.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 450.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:450.2. (a) In order to avoid a potential for a conflict of interest, a public member of a board shall not:(1) Be a current or past licensee of that board.(2) Be a close family member of a licensee of that board.(b) For purposes of this section, “close family member” means a parent, stepparent, sibling, child by blood, adoption, or marriage, spouse, domestic partner, cohabitant, stepchild, immediate in-law, aunt, uncle, first cousin, grandparent, or grandchild. includes, but is not limited to, a parent or a child.(c) Each board within the department shall adopt regulations consistent with this section that provide guidance on how to determine whether the existence of a relationship other than a parent-child relationship prohibits an individual from serving as a public member of a board.